Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2586YH (2) 91 ll/js H.F. 719 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE ââ LOCAL TAXING 1 AUTHORITIES ââ REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS. 2 1. The department of revenue, in consultation with the 3 department of government efficiency task force, shall issue 4 a request for proposals to hire a private entity to conduct 5 a study of local taxing authorities in this state in order 6 to achieve the most efficient and cost-effective methods for 7 local taxing authorities to levy and collect taxes and assess 8 property values or other applicable taxing methods. 9 2. The request for proposals shall be issued by July 1, 10 2026, and a contract shall be executed with the contractor 11 selected by October 1, 2026. The contract shall provide that 12 ninety percent of the total cost shall be paid by the state and 13 ten percent of the total cost shall be paid by the local taxing 14 authorities as determined by the department of revenue. 15 3. The department of revenue shall submit to the general 16 assembly a report detailing findings from the study conducted 17 by the private entity by June 30, 2027. 18 4. For purposes of this section, âlocal taxing authorityâ 19 includes a county, city, school district, township, or an 20 entity organized pursuant to chapter 28E that has taxing 21 authority. 22 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 23 3, shall not apply to this Act. 24